Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,181
Remedial Action Plan Monitoring Act, how cited.

Sections 81-15,181 to 81-15,188 shall be known and may be cited as the Remedial Action Plan Monitoring Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1349, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 449, § 4.